Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6343.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 30311d. (1) In accordance with section 30302, the legislature finds that wetland conservation is a matter of state concern. It is the intent of the legislature that this section be administered in a manner to achieve no net loss of wetland acreage, function, and public value. The department shall consider mitigation only if the wetland impacts are permitted under this part, and it is established that no feasible and prudent alternatives exist to avoid wetland impacts, and an applicant for a permit has used all practical means to minimize wetland impacts. (2) (1) The department may impose as a condition on any permit, other than a general permit, under this part a requirement for compensatory wetland mitigation. The department may approve 1 or more of the following methods of compensatory wetland mitigation: (a) The acquisition of approved credits from a wetland mitigation bank. The department shall not require a permit applicant to provide compensatory wetland mitigation under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) if the applicant prefers and qualifies to use approved credits from the wetland mitigation bank to provide required compensatory wetland mitigation under this subdivision.Mitigation credits from a mitigation bank may be used in the service area of the mitigation bank, or if mitigation credits are not available in the service area of the mitigation bank, mitigation credits may be used in the watershed or ecoregion that touch the service area if the department determines that wetland functions will be replaced appropriately by the mitigation credits and any needed increase in ratios is included. (b) The restoration of previously existing wetland. The restoration of previously existing wetland Restoration is preferred over the creation of new wetland where none previously existed. (c) The creation of new wetlands, if the permit applicant demonstrates that ecological conditions necessary for establishment of a self-sustaining wetland ecosystem exist or will be created. (d) The preservation of exceptional wetlandswetland or wetland that is an ecological type that is rare or endangered. (3) (2) If compensatory wetland mitigation under subsection (1)(b), (2)(b), (c), or (d) is required, a permit applicant shall submit a mitigation plan to the department for approval. In approving a compensatory mitigation plan, the department shall consider how the location and type of wetland mitigation supports the sustainability or improvement of aquatic resources in the watershed where the activity is permitted. The permit applicant shall provide for permanent protection of the wetland mitigation site. base its determination on documented findings regarding ecological function and watershed sustainability. The permit applicant shall provide for the permanent protection of the mitigation site as part of the mitigation plan. The department may accept a conservation easement to protect wetland mitigation and associated upland. (4) (3) If a permittee carries out compensatory wetland mitigation under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) in cooperation with public agencies , or private organizations, or other parties, the permittee remains responsible for the compensatory wetland mitigation to the extent otherwise provided by law. (5) (4) The department may require financial assurance to ensure that completion of compensatory wetland mitigation is accomplished as specified. To ensure that wetland benefits are replaced by compensatory wetland mitigation, the department may release financial assurance only after the permit applicant or mitigation bank sponsor has completed monitoring of the mitigation site and demonstrated and may release the financial assurance only after compliance with performance standards in accordance with a schedule in the permit or mitigation banking agreement.has been demonstrated. (6) (5) If compensatory wetland mitigation is required, in setting the mitigation ratio for ecological types of wetland, the department shall consider the method of compensatory mitigation, the likelihood of success, differences between the functions lost at the impacted site and the functions expected to be produced by the compensatory mitigation project, temporary losses of aquatic resource functions, the difficulty of restoring or establishing the desired aquatic resource type and functions, and the distance between the affected aquatic resource and the mitigation site. For uses of wetland, the department may provide flexibility in the ratio when requiring compensatory wetland mitigation. (7) (6) For agricultural activities, a permit applicant may provide for protection and restoration of the impacted site under a conservation easement with the department as part of mitigation requirements. A permit applicant may make a payment into the stewardship fund, if established under subsection (7), (8), as part of mitigation requirements, as an alternative to providing financial assurances required under subsection (4).(5). (8) (7) The department may establish a stewardship fund in the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund . The state treasurer shall and credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund. The department shall be is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. The department shall expend money from the fund , upon on appropriation, only to develop mitigation for impacted sites or as an alternative to financial assurance required under subsection (4).(5). (9) (8) By 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, Not later than 1 year after the effective date of the 2026 amendatory act that amended this section, the department shall submit to the office of regulatory reform for informal review revised administrative rules on mitigation for informal review that do all of consider the following principles, where appropriate, are based on documented findings, and are consistent with subsection (1): (a) Reduce the preference for on-site mitigation. (a) (b) Allow flexibility Flexibility in mitigation ratios for uses of wetlands.where ecological outcomes are maintained or improved. (b) (c) Allow a reduction of mitigation ratios when Consideration of approved mitigation bank credits. from a wetland mitigation bank are used. (c) (d) Allow consideration Consideration of additional ecologically beneficial features. (d) Encourage the development of wetland mitigation banks and ensure no net loss of wetlands. (e) Allow any excess mitigation for any project to be credited to another project at a later date. (9) The department shall submit revised administrative rules that encourage the development of wetland mitigation banks to the office of regulatory reform for informal review within 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection. The rules shall do all of the following: (a) Enlarge mitigation bank service areas. However, a service area shall be located within the same watershed or ecoregion as the permitted project or activity, ensure no net loss of the wetland resources, and protect the predominant wetland functions of the service area. The department shall consider enlarging the size of ecoregions for mitigation bank service areas. (b) Allow earlier release of credits if the benefits of a mitigation bank have been properly established and the credits are revocable or covered by a financial assurance. (c) Allow wetland preservation to be used in areas where wetland restoration opportunities do not exist, if an unacceptable disruption of the aquatic resources will not result. (10) The department shall establish a wetland mitigation bank funding program under part 52 that provides grants and loans to eligible municipalities for the purposes of establishing mitigation banks. (10) The department shall not approve mitigation bank credits for an initial proposal or material modification, unless all of the following have occurred: (a) The mitigation bank sponsor has done both of the following: (i) Notified each local unit of government where the mitigation bank wetland is located and adjacent residents and property owners by first-class mail that the mitigation bank sponsor submitted an application to the department under this part. (ii) A study that demonstrates how much wetland exists and is available for mitigation banking in the mitigation bank wetland. (b) The department provides notice and an opportunity for a public hearing. A public hearing under this subdivision must be held in the community in which the mitigation bank is located. (c) Not later than 30 days after the public hearing is conducted under subdivision (b), the local unit of government where the mitigation wetland bank is located notifies the department in writing that the local unit of government approves the use of mitigation credits from the mitigation bank. The local unit of government shall provide, with the notice under this subdivision, a copy of the local unit of government's wetland ordinance adopted under section 30307(4), if applicable.